Illinois, session 104th, HB5596.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Commemorative Dates Act is amended by 5changing Section 105 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 490/105)7    Sec. 105. POW/MIA Recognition Day. The Governor shall 8annually designate by official proclamation the third Friday 9of September in each year is designated as POW/MIA Recognition 10Day to be observed throughout the State as a day in honor and 11remembrance of the men and women of this State who, as POWs, 12have suffered captivity in foreign countries while in active 13service with the United States armed forces or who, as MIAs, 14have been recognized as missing in action were recognized as 15POWs or MIAs while serving with the armed forces of the United 16States in a time of war or during a period of hostilities. The 17Governor shall request, in the Governor's annual designation 18by official proclamation, that some portion of the third 19Friday of September be used for solemn contemplation on the 20plight of members of the United States armed forces who have 21been held prisoners of war and members of the United States 22armed forces who have been missing in action and the resolve of 23families and friends who continue to seek the fullest possible   HB5596- 2 -LRB104 18465 BDA 31907 b1accounting for missing loved ones. 2(Source: P.A. 90-752, eff. 8-14-98.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.